Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 351. STARR AND ZAPATA COUNTIES

SUBCHAPTER A. FALCON LAKE

Sec. 351.001. COMMERCIAL CATFISH FISHING. (a) Notwithstanding any other law and except as provided by Subsection (b), a person may engage in commercial catfish fishing in the portion of Falcon Lake in this state that borders Starr and Zapata Counties if the person:

(1) holds the required commercial fishing license issued by the department; and

(2) engages in the commercial fishing on a vessel licensed as a commercial fishing boat by the department.

(b) The department may regulate the amount of catfish taken from the portion of Falcon Lake described by Subsection (a) if the department determines that regulation is necessary to protect the catfish population in Falcon Lake from depletion or waste.

(c) The commission may adopt rules related to commercial catfish fishing in Falcon Lake.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 760 (H.B. 1181), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.